Washington statutes.
RCW 35.37.090

General indebtedness bonds—Issuance and sale.

All general indebtedness bonds shall be issued and sold in accordance with chapter 39.46 RCW.

[ 1984 c 186 s 17; 1983 c 167 s 36; 1965 c 7 s 35.37.090. Prior: (i) 1891 c 128 s 5, part; RRS s 9543, part. (ii) 1891 c 128 s 6, part; RRS s 9544, part.]

NOTES:

Purpose—1984 c 186: See note following RCW 39.46.110.

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.